Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-119] Scope of examination.
(a) The commissioner shall prescribe each examination, and each examination
shall be of reasonably sufficient scope to test the applicant's knowledge
relative to the classes of insurance that may be dealt with under the license
applied for, the duties and responsibilities relating thereto, and the laws of
this State that are applicable to the licensee.

(b) The commissioner is required to prepare
and make available to insurance producers a printed manual specifying in
general terms the subjects which may be covered in any examination for a
particular license. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next